Tennessee, session 114, HB2254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-5002(3), is amended by
deleting the semicolon ";" at the end of the subdivision and substituting "and may be submitted
electronically;".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2254
012596
- 1 -